Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-905
Mental health board, defined.

Mental health board means a board created under section 71-915.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1004;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 25.